Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.10.500

Removal of regents or trustees from universities and The Evergreen State College.

No regent of the state universities, or trustee of the regional universities or of The Evergreen State College shall be removed during the term of office for which appointed, excepting only for misconduct or malfeasance in office, and then only in the manner hereinafter provided. Before any regent or trustee may be removed for such misconduct or malfeasance, a petition for removal, stating the nature of the misconduct or malfeasance of such regent or trustee with reasonable particularity, shall be signed and verified by the governor and served upon such regent or trustee. Said petition, together with proof of service of same upon such regent or trustee, shall forthwith be filed with the clerk of the supreme court. The chief justice of the supreme court shall thereupon designate a tribunal composed of three judges of the superior court to hear and adjudicate the charges. Such tribunal shall fix the time of hearing, which shall be public, and the procedure for the hearing, and the decision of such tribunal shall be final and not subject to review by the supreme court. Removal of any member of the board by the tribunal shall disqualify such member for reappointment.

[ 1977 ex.s. c 169 s 21; 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28B.10.500. Prior: 1943 c 59 s 1; Rem. Supp. 1943 s 4603-1. Formerly RCW 28.76.290.]

NOTES:

Severability—Nomenclature—Savings—1977 ex.s. c 169: See notes following RCW 28B.10.016.